New York, session 2025-2026, S9296.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 11-0704 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as added by chapter 507 of the laws of 2010, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 4. the person to whom such license is to be transferred is related to 5 the person to whom such license was issued by the first degree of 6 consanguinity, or legal marriage to such person, or is the adopted child 7 or step child or step sibling of such person; with the exception of 8 permits or licenses for whelk, crab or horseshoe crab, food fish, 9 including summer flounder (fluke) and striped bass which may be trans- 10 ferred to persons outside of persons described in this subdivision. Such 11 transfers shall meet the following requirements, including, but not 12 limited to: 13 (a) fifty-one percent of gross income shall be derived from commercial 14 fishing for three consecutive years before becoming eligible. For the 15 purposes of this section, "commercial fishing" means revenue generated 16 from catching, harvesting or farming aquatic life, including but not 17 limited to, fish, shellfish and crustaceans, for sale to generate 18 profit; and 19 (b) transfer of such permits and/or licenses may occur only one time 20 per year; and 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 22 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15015-02-6